Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
ARTICLE 47
CEMETERY COMPANIES

Cross references:

(1) For definitions applicable to this article, see § 7-90-102.

(2) For preneed funeral contracts, see article 15 of title 10; for mortuaries, see article 135 of title 12.

Section

7-47-101. Who may organize - powers.

Three or more persons may associate themselves together under the provisions of law, for the purpose of procuring and establishing a cemetery or place of sepulture, and they shall, upon association and compliance with the provisions of law, be a body politic and corporate; may sue and be sued; may have a common seal that may be altered at pleasure; may purchase, hold, and convey real and personal estate; may choose a president and other officers; may enact bylaws for regulating the affairs of the corporation, not inconsistent with the law of this state, and compel the observance thereof by suitable penalties; and may do all acts necessary for the well ordering of the affairs of such corporation.

(1.5) (a) A board of directors for a nonprofit cemetery corporation shall include at least one director who owns a lot, grave space, niche, or crypt. If such an owner cannot be found to serve as a director, the board of directors shall maintain a vacancy until the director position can be filled with such an owner. A nonprofit cemetery corporation may wait until the first vacancy on the board of directors occurs after January 1, 2013, before appointing a director who owns a lot, grave space, niche, or crypt.

This subsection (1.5) applies only to cemeteries as defined in section 6-24-101 (2).

A nonprofit corporation subject to the "Colorado Revised Nonprofit Corporation Act", articles 121 to 137 of this title, shall have all of the rights and powers granted by this article to the extent not inconsistent with said act, if such nonprofit corporation otherwise complies with the terms and provisions of this article.

Source:

G.L.

§ 236.

G.S.

§ 379.

R.S. 08:

§ 1047.

C.L.

§ 2430.

CSA:

C. 41, § 227.

CRS 53:

§ 31-26-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 31-22-1.

L. 67:

p. 659, § 13.

L. 97:

(2) amended, p. 757, § 14, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 2003:

(1) amended, p. 2209, § 28, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2012:

(1.5) added, (HB 12-1068), ch. 229, p. 1008, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2017:

(1.5)(b) amended, (HB 17-1244), ch. 239, p. 983, § 2, effective August 9.

7-47-102. May acquire land.

Any corporation formed under the law of this state to establish and maintain a cemetery or burial place for the dead may acquire suitable and sufficient land therefor in the manner provided by articles 1 to 7 of title 38, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 1887:

p. 70, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 1048.

C.L.

§ 2431.

CSA:

C. 41, § 228.

CRS 53:

§ 31-26-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 31-22-2.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2209, § 29, effective July 1, 2004.

7-47-103. Land surveyed and platted.

Such corporation shall cause its land, or such portion thereof as may, from time to time, become necessary for that purpose, to be surveyed into lots, avenues, and walks, and to be platted. The plat of ground as surveyed shall be acknowledged by some officer of the corporation and filed in the office of the recorder of the county in which the land is situated. Each lot shall be regularly numbered by the surveyor, and such number shall be marked on the plat.

Source:

L. 1887:

p. 70, § 2.

R.S. 08:

§ 1049.

C.L.

§ 2432.

CSA:

C. 41, § 229.

CRS 53:

§ 31-26-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 31-22-3.

7-47-104. Disposition of proceeds of sales of lots.

The net proceeds arising from the sale of lots by such corporation and all other income and revenue thereof, after paying for cemetery ground, shall be exclusively applied, appropriated, and used in improving, preserving, and embellishing the cemetery and its appurtenances, and to paying the necessary expenses of the corporation, and shall not be appropriated for any purpose of profit to the corporation or its members.

Source:

L. 1887:

p. 70, § 3.

R.S. 08:

§ 1050.

C.L.

§ 2433.

CSA:

C. 41, § 230.

CRS 53:

§ 31-26-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 31-22-4.

7-47-104.5. Reports.

Each nonprofit cemetery corporation shall keep in its principal office and, upon reasonable request, shall make available for inspection and study to the owner of any grave space, niche, or crypt, or to a duly authorized representative of the owner, the following:

An annual written report setting forth the number of interments and entombments maintained by the nonprofit cemetery corporation, the number of interments and entombments for the preceding year, and any other facts necessary to show the actual financial condition of the nonprofit cemetery corporation;

A complete and current copy of any bylaws or articles of incorporation adopted by the board of directors;

A copy of the minutes of each meeting of the board of directors for the last three years;

A copy of each periodic report filed during the last three years with the Colorado secretary of state in accordance with section 7-90-501;

A copy of internal revenue service form 990 reports, or any successor form or report, for the last three years; and

A copy of the corporation's current balance sheet, income statement, and cash-flow statement.

To comply with this section, the report must be attested to by the accountant, auditor, or other person preparing the report and verified by a vote of the board of directors.

Upon written request for a specific list of documents, the nonprofit cemetery shall provide to any owner of a lot, grave space, niche, or crypt electronic or physical copies of any reports required by this section. The nonprofit cemetery shall fulfill the request within seven days after receipt of the request and payment of a copying charge, if paper copies are required or requested, not to exceed twenty-five cents per physical copied page. The nonprofit cemetery shall not charge for electronic copies.

Source:

L. 2012:

Entire section added, (HB 12-1068), ch. 229, p. 1008, § 2, effective August 8.

7-47-105. Rights of lot owners.

If the grounds purchased or otherwise acquired for cemetery purposes have been previously used as a burial ground, those who are lot owners at the time of the purchase continue to own the lots and are members of the corporation.

An owner of a lot, grave space, niche, or crypt may attend any meeting of the board of directors. The board of directors shall provide reasonable notice of any board meeting to owners of a lot, grave space, niche, or crypt, who may not participate in meetings of the board of directors without permission of the chairperson.

Source:

L. 1887:

p. 70, § 4.

R.S. 08:

§ 1051.

C.L.

§ 2434.

CSA:

C. 41, § 231.

CRS 53:

§ 31-26-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 31-22-5.

L. 2012:

Entire section amended, (HB 12-1068), ch. 229, p. 1009, § 3, effective August 8.

7-47-106. Property exempt from taxes - attachment.

All the property of such corporation used or owned for the purposes of this article shall be exempt from taxation, assessment, lien, attachment, and levy and sale upon execution, except for the purchase price of the property.

Source:

L. 1887:

p. 71, § 5.

R.S. 08:

§ 1052.

C.L.

§ 2435.

CSA:

C. 41, § 232.

CRS 53:

§ 31-26-6.

L. 59:

p. 532, § 7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 31-22-6.

Cross references:

For mortuaries located in cemeteries, see § 12-135-201.

7-47-107. Property not exempt - when.

The property of any corporation or association formed under the law of this state to establish and maintain a cemetery for the purposes of profit shall not be exempt from taxation, liens, or levy and sale until actually sold or disposed of for cemetery purposes; and when any block, lot, or parcel of land has been disposed of for cemetery purposes or burial sites for the dead, the same, with streets, walks, and avenues leading thereto, shall be exempt as provided by section 7-47-106.

Source:

L. 1891:

p. 58, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 1053.

C.L.

§ 2436.

CSA:

C. 41, § 233.

CRS 53:

§ 31-26-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 31-22-7.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2210, § 30, effective July 1, 2004.

7-47-108. Not applicable - when.

The provisions of section 7-47-104 shall not apply to any association or corporation formed under the law of this state to maintain a cemetery for profit.

Source:

L. 1891:

p. 58, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 1054.

C.L.

§ 2437.

CSA:

C. 41, § 234.

CRS 53:

§ 31-26-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 31-22-8.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2210, § 31, effective July 1, 2004.

7-47-109. Abandoned graves - right to reclaim.

If there is a lot, grave space, niche, or crypt in a cemetery in which no remains have been interred, no burial memorial has been placed, and no other improvement has been made for a continuous period of no less than seventy-five years, the corporation that established or maintains the cemetery, referred to in this section as the "corporation", may initiate the process of reclaiming title to the lot, grave space, niche, or crypt in accordance with this section.

A corporation seeking to reclaim a lot, grave space, niche, or crypt shall:

Send written notice of the corporation's intent to reclaim title to the lot, grave space, niche, or crypt to the owner's last-known address by first-class mail; and

Publish a notice of the corporation's intent to reclaim title to the lot, grave space, niche, or crypt in a newspaper of general circulation in the area in which the cemetery is located once per week for four weeks.

The notice required by subsection (2) of this section shall clearly indicate that the corporation intends to terminate the owner's rights and title to the lot, grave space, niche, or crypt and include a recitation of the owner's right to notify the corporation of the owner's intent to retain ownership of the lot, grave space, niche, or crypt.

If the corporation does not receive from the owner of the lot, grave space, niche, or crypt a letter of intent to retain ownership of the lot, grave space, niche, or crypt within sixty days after the last publication of the notice required by paragraph (b) of subsection (2) of this section, all rights and title to the lot, grave space, niche, or crypt shall transfer to the corporation. The corporation may then sell, transfer, or otherwise dispose of the lot, grave space, niche, or crypt without risk of liability to the prior owner of the lot, grave space, niche, or crypt.

A corporation that reclaims title to a lot, grave space, niche, or crypt in accordance with this section shall retain in its records for no less than one year a copy of the notice sent pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of this section and a copy of the notice published pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection (2) of this section.

If a person submits to a corporation a legitimate claim to a lot, grave space, niche, or crypt that the corporation has reclaimed pursuant to this section, the corporation shall transfer to the person at no charge a lot, grave space, niche, or crypt that, to the extent possible, is equivalent to the reclaimed lot, grave space, niche, or crypt.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, on and after August 7, 2006, a corporation shall not convey title to the real property surveyed as a lot in a cemetery for use as a burial space. A corporation may grant interment rights to a lot, grave space, niche, or crypt in a cemetery.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire section added, p. 441, § 1, effective August 7.